Hawaii statutes.
[§173A‑2.5] Responsibilities of the
legacy land conservation commission. The responsibilities of the
commission shall include, but not be limited to:

(1) Advising the department and the board on any
proposal, public or private, for the acquisition of any interest or rights in
land having value as a resource to the State;

(2) Advising the department and the board on any
requests for grants from the fund to a qualifying state or county agency or
nonprofit land conservation organization for the preservation of lands having
value as a resource to the State;

(3) Recommending to the board the acquisition of
interests or rights in certain lands having value as a resource to the State;
and

(4) Reviewing and adopting rules relating to the
criteria it applies in advising the department and the board and making
recommendations to the board regarding land acquisitions and grants made
pursuant to this chapter. [L 2006, c 254, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next